Arkansas, session 2025, HB1620.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Pharmacy and
Pharmacist Timely Reconciliation and Payment of Pharmacist Services Act".

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) It is beneficial to the State of Arkansas to support patient
access to prescription drugs and pharmacy services in a market that minimizes
difficulties caused by slow payments from pharmacy benefits managers to
improve patient care;
*ANS255*
02/27/2025 7:38:24 AM ANS255

HB1620
(2) Requiring prompt payment of coverage of prescription drugs
to an Arkansas-licensed pharmacy and pharmacist will ensure that these
pharmacies and pharmacists have stable and predictable cash flow from
contracted intermediaries, vendors, pharmacy benefits managers, and claims
processors hired by pharmaceutical manufacturers; and
(3) Prompt payment policies will improve the ability of an
Arkansas-licensed pharmacy to:
(A) Serve patients with better and more stable
prescription drug inventory for immediate patient-care needs; and
(B) Better respond to future national security threats and
natural disasters in the communities of Arkansas.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 17-92-1201, concerning the Arkansas
Pharmacy Audit Bill of Rights, is amended to add an additional subsection to
read as follows:
(i) This section does apply to the Arkansas Medicaid Program,
including a vendor or an entity that is hired or contracted by the Arkansas
Medicaid Program to conduct an audit of pharmacy claims processed under the
Arkansas Medicaid Program.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 92, Subchapter 12, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
17-92-1202. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) "Audit" means a financial audit, performance audit,
information technology audit, review, report of agreed-upon procedures,
compilation, examination, investigation, prepayment audit, or other report or
procedure regarding the practice of pharmacy, including without limitation an
audit of a pharmacist or pharmacy for pharmacist services.
(B) "Audit" includes a prescription validation request or
prescription validation review if:
(i) The prescription validation request or review
requires the pharmacist or pharmacy to submit additional information to the
pharmacy benefits manager after a claim has been processed successfully at
the point of sale; or
(ii) There is any attempted or required recoupment
02/27/2025 7:38:24 AM ANS255

HB1620
of funds or denial of payment to the pharmacy or pharmacist after a
successful electronically billed or submitted claim based on a prescription
validation request or prescription validation review;
(2) "Prepayment audit" means an audit or review that occurs
shortly after the sale and dispensing of a drug to a patient and before the
reimbursement payment to the pharmacy, regardless of the label given to the
audit or review or the method used to communicate the prepayment audit to the
pharmacy;
(3) "Prescription validation request or review" means
information provided to a pharmacy or pharmacist to help educate, clarify, or
verify the accuracy and validity of prescription claim submissions; and
(4) "Randomly selected" means selected without method or
conscious decision.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 23-92-503(8), concerning the definition of
"pharmacy benefits manager" used under the Arkansas Pharmacy Benefits Manager
Licensure Act, is amended to read as follows:
(8)(A) "Pharmacy benefits manager" means a person, business, or
entity, including a wholly or partially owned or controlled subsidiary of a
pharmacy benefits manager, that provides claims processing services, pharmacy
benefits management services, or other prescription drug or device services,
or both any combination of the three (3), for health benefit plans.
(B) "Pharmacy benefits manager" does not include any:
(i) Healthcare facility licensed in Arkansas;
(ii) Healthcare professional licensed in Arkansas;
(iii) Consultant who only provides advice as to the
selection or performance of a pharmacy benefits manager; or
(iv) Entity that provides claims processing services
or other prescription drug or device services for the fee-for-service
Arkansas Medicaid Program only in that capacity;

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 23-92-503, concerning definitions used
under the Arkansas Pharmacy Benefits Manager Licensure Act, is amended to add
additional subdivisions to read as follows:
(16)(A) "Clean claim" means a pharmacy claim that does not have
a defect, including without limitation a lack of any required substantiating
02/27/2025 7:38:24 AM ANS255

HB1620
documentation or particular circumstance requiring special treatment that may
prevent timely payment of the pharmacy claim.
(B) "Clean claim" includes an electronic pharmacy claim
that successfully processes in real time with an approval of drug, dosing,
prescriber, or patient eligibility upon an electronic adjudication of a
pharmacy claim with the displayed paid amount from the pharmacy benefits
manager and the patient copay.
(C) "Clean claim" does not include a successfully
adjudicated pharmacy claim that the pharmacy or pharmacist obtained by fraud
or a clerical error or misrepresentation of the pharmacy claim elements;
(17) "Date of the receipt of a claim" means a claim that is
considered to have been received:
(A) For an electronic claim, on the date on which the
claim is transferred; or
(B) For other manual or paper claim, on the fifth day
after the postmark date of the claim or the date specified in the time stamp
of the transmission, whichever is sooner;
(18) "Material alteration to a contract" means a change to a
contract or addendum to a contract that shall be made explicitly and shall
not be made by reference through a pharmacy provider manual;
(19)(A) "Pharmacy benefits management services" means the
management or administration of a plan or program that:
(i) Pays or reimburses for a price and covers the
cost of prescription drugs and medical devices;
(ii) Includes the processing and payment of claims
for prescription drugs and the adjudication of appeals or grievances related
to the prescription drug benefit;
(iii) Includes electronic or manual processing and
payment of claims through the adjudication of prescription drug manufacturer
coupons or prescription drug manufacturer discounts; or
(iv) Includes prescription discount card services,
processing, electronic adjudication, or payment of claims for prescription
drugs by a discount card or discount card processor in situations in which a
vendor that otherwise identifies itself as a discount card vendor has been
subcontracted or contracted directly or indirectly by another licensed
pharmacy benefits manager or healthcare payor.
02/27/2025 7:38:24 AM ANS255

HB1620
(B) "Pharmacy benefits management services" does not
include a prescription discount card service if the:
(i) Entire amount is paid by the patient, and the
individual pharmacy has directly contracted with the prescription discount
card service for each individual pharmacy and not through a pharmacy services
administrative organization or a leased pharmacy benefits manager network; or
(ii) Entire amount is paid by the patient, and the
discount card is an in-house pharmacy discount card;
(20)(A) "Pharmacy provider manual" means a document provided by
a pharmacy benefits manager to a pharmacist or pharmacy that may provide
contracted pharmacy providers with information about regulations,
administrative procedures, billing instructions, information on how to meet
the pharmacist's or pharmacy's contractual obligations, contact information,
audit information, maximum allowable cost appeals, pricing appeals, and other
details about various networks managed by the pharmacy benefits manager.
(B) "Pharmacy provider manual" does not include a material
alteration to a contract that shall be made explicitly in a contract or
addendum;
(21)(A) "Prescription drug manufacturer" or "pharmaceutical
manufacturer" means a business or entity that makes, processes, or packages
prescription drugs, over-the-counter medications, or medical devices to sell
in a pharmacy or other healthcare facility.
(B) "Prescription drug manufacturer" or "pharmaceutical
manufacturer" includes an entity that manipulates, tests, or controls the
product or process; and
(22) "Prescription drug manufacturer coupon" or "pharmaceutical
manufacturer coupon" means a prescription drug discount that is:
(A) Utilized to reduce the cost of prescription
medications in a pharmacy at the point of sale in the form of copayment
reduction, discount, e-voucher, electronic voucher, or a card to help a
consumer reduce the out-of-pocket costs, including without limitation a
copayment and coinsurance, or otherwise lower the overall cost of
prescription drugs; and
(B) Sponsored or provided by a prescription drug
manufacturer or pharmaceutical manufacturer usually through a vendor or an
electronic claims processor.
02/27/2025 7:38:24 AM ANS255

HB1620

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 92, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add additional sections to read as follows:
23-92-512. Pharmacy claims — Procedures.
(a) On and after January 1, 2026, a contract or a pharmacy provider
manual between a pharmacy benefits manager and a pharmacy or a pharmacist
shall be updated to indicate that the pharmacy benefits manager will issue,
mail, or otherwise transmit payment with respect to a clean claim submitted
by a pharmacy or a pharmacist:
(1) Seven (7) to fourteen (14) days after the date of the
receipt of a claim for an electronic claim; or
(2) Thirty (30) days after the date of the receipt of a claim
for any other paper or manually submitted claim.
(b)(1) A claim is a clean claim if the pharmacy benefits manager
receiving the claim does not provide notice to the submitting pharmacist or
pharmacy of any deficiency or error in the claim within:
(A) Ten (10) days after the date of the receipt of a claim
for an electronic claim; or
(B) Fifteen (15) days after the date of the receipt of a
claim for any other manual or paper claim.
(2)(A) If a pharmacy benefits manager determines that a
submitted claim is not a clean claim, the pharmacy benefits manager shall
notify the submitting pharmacy or pharmacist of the determination within the
period described under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.
(B) The notification required under subdivision (b)(2)(A)
of this section shall:
(i) Be submitted in writing or electronically by
email to the pharmacist or pharmacy to specify all defects, clerical errors,
or improprieties in the claim; and
(ii) List any additional information necessary for
the proper processing and payment of the claim.
(3)(A) After the additional information described in subdivision
(b)(2)(B)(ii) of this section is submitted by the network pharmacy, a claim
becomes a clean claim within ten (10) days if the pharmacy benefits manager
does not provide notice to the submitting network pharmacy of any remaining
defect or impropriety in the claim or of any new defect or impropriety in the
02/27/2025 7:38:24 AM ANS255

HB1620
additional information submitted.
(B) A pharmacy benefits manager shall not provide notice
of a new deficiency or impropriety in the claim that could have been
identified by the pharmacy benefits manager in the original claim submission
under this subsection.
(c) A claim submitted to a pharmacy benefits manager that is not paid
by the pharmacy benefits manager within the time frame specified in
subdivision (a)(1) or subdivision (a)(2) of this section or is contested by
the pharmacy benefits manager within the time frame specified in subdivision
(b)(2) of this section shall be:
(1) Deemed to be a clean claim; and
(2) Paid by the pharmacy benefits manager according to
subsection (a) of this section.
(d) A payment of a clean claim under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section is considered to have been made on the date that:
(1) The payment is transferred, for an electronic claim; or
(2) The payment is submitted to the United States Postal Service
or common carrier for delivery, for any other claim.
(e)(1)(A) A pharmacy benefits manager shall pay a penalty of twelve
percent (12%) per month for a late payment of claims to the contracted
pharmacist or pharmacy.
(B) The penalty described under subdivision (e)(1)(A) of
this section begins the day after the required payment date and ends on the
date on which the proper payment for the clean claim is made.
(2)(A) As determined by the Insurance Commissioner, a pharmacy
benefits manager shall not be penalized or required to pay interest under
subdivision (e)(1) of this section in exigent circumstances that prevent the
timely processing of claims, including natural disasters and other unique and
unexpected events, unless it involves a cybersecurity breach or a data
security issue with the pharmacy benefits manager or healthcare payor.
(B) A cybersecurity breach or a data security issue
involving the pharmacy benefits manager or the healthcare payor that delays
payment to a pharmacist or a pharmacy is subject to interest payments.
(f)(1) A pharmacy benefits manager shall pay a clean claim submitted
electronically by an electronic transfer of funds if the submitting network
pharmacy so requests or has so requested previously that contract year.
02/27/2025 7:38:24 AM ANS255

HB1620
(2) If the payment is made electronically, remittance may also
be made electronically by the pharmacy benefits manager.
(g)(1) This section does not prohibit or limit a claim or action that
an individual or organization has against a pharmacy, provider, or pharmacy
benefits manager that is not covered by the subject matter of this section.
(2) A pharmacy benefits manager shall not retaliate against an
individual, pharmacy, or provider for exercising a right of action under
subdivision (g)(1) of this section, as consistent with applicable federal or
state law.

23-92-513. Pharmaceutical manufacturers.
(a) A pharmaceutical manufacturer that utilizes a vendor, pharmacy
benefits manager, or electronic claims processor to process prescription drug
manufacturer coupons or pharmaceutical manufacturer coupons shall:
(1) Have an active wholesale distributor permit and be in good
standing with the Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy under § 20-64-505; and
(2) Ensure that an intermediary, vendor, pharmacy benefits
manager, or a claims processor complies with timely payment of a pharmacy
claim as required under § 23-92-512.
(b)(1) The board shall require a pharmaceutical manufacturer to pay
twelve percent (12%) interest per month directly to the affected pharmacy or
pharmacist if the pharmaceutical manufacturer's vendor or intermediary does
not resolve a complaint for a clean claim's being paid within:
(A) Fourteen (14) days after the date of the receipt of a
claim for an electronic claim; or
(B) Thirty (30) days after the date of the receipt of a
claim for any other paper or manually submitted claim.
(2) The penalty described under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section begins the day after the required payment date and ends on the date
on which the proper payment for the clean claim is made.






02/27/2025 7:38:24 AM ANS255